Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1503.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 201(d)(17) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 201. Definitions.--The following words, terms and phrases when used in this Article II shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(d) "Processing." The performance of the following 12345678910111213141516171819202122 activities when engaged in as a business enterprise:* * *(17) The producing of Internet access, as defined in section 1105(5) of the Internet Tax Freedom Act (47 U.S.C. § 151 note) as of December 23, 2003, or mobile telecommunications services.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1503PN1758 - 2 - 1234567